Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2507
False or fraudulent registration; liability.

Any person who for himself or herself or on behalf of any other person files or registers any name in the office of the Secretary of State under the Name Protection Act by knowingly making any false or fraudulent representation or declaration, verbally or in writing, or by any other fraudulent means, shall be liable to pay all damages sustained in consequence of such filing or registration, to be recovered by or on behalf of the party injured in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1986, LB 1025, § 7.